Washington statutes.
RCW 36.54.060

Joint ferries over water boundary between two counties—Audit and allowance of claims.

All claims and accounts for the construction, operation and maintenance of a joint county ferry shall be presented to and audited by the joint commission: PROVIDED, That items of expense connected with the operation of such ferry which do not exceed the sum of thirty dollars may be presented to the chair of the joint commission and allowed by him or her and when allowed shall be a joint charge against the road fund of each of the counties operating such ferry.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4093; 1963 c 4 s 36.54.060. Prior: 1917 c 158 s 4; RRS s 5482.]